Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.070

Board of trustees.

(1) The board of trustees shall consist of seven members, one of whom shall be the state insurance commissioner, ex officio; three elective city officials eligible to the benefits of the system who shall be appointed by the governor from a list of six city officials submitted by the executive committee of the association of Washington cities as the official representative of cities and towns in the state. Original terms of office of the appointees shall be one, two and three years as designated by the governor; thereafter terms shall be for three years duration. Appointments to fill vacancies other than those caused by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired term. Appointees shall serve until successors have been appointed and qualified.

In addition to these four members, there shall be three city employees who shall be elected by a secret ballot vote of the city employees who are members of the system. The method and details of such election shall be determined by the board of trustees. The first such election shall be held in June of 1968. The original terms of office for the elected city employee members shall be one, two and three years as designated by the board of trustees, and such terms shall begin July 1, 1968; thereafter terms shall be for three years' duration. In the case of vacancies of elected city employee positions the board of trustees shall appoint city employees to serve for the unexpired terms. Such appointees shall serve until successors have been elected.

(2) The board shall annually, dating from the first officially recorded meeting, elect a chair and secretary. Four members shall constitute a quorum.

(3) Each member of the board shall take an oath of office that he or she will diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the board, and that he or she will not knowingly violate or willfully permit to be violated any of the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2012 c 117 s 62; 1967 ex.s. c 28 s 7; 1947 c 71 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-136.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1967 ex.s. c 28: See notes following RCW 41.44.030.